Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.03
Relationship of Nebraska Department of Health and Human Services to United States central authority.

The Nebraska Department of Health and Human Services is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the Convention.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 50.